Illinois, session 104th, HB5529.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Commerce and Economic 5Opportunity Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois 6is amended by adding Section 871 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 605/871 new)8    Sec. 871. Strengthen Illinois Homes Program.9    (a) In this Section:10    "Area of need" means regions throughout the State of 11Illinois at the highest risk of catastrophic wind and hail 12events based on historical data determined by the Department.13    "County area median family income" means the 14county-specific area median family income guidelines published 15by the Illinois Housing Development Authority.16    "Eligible grantee" means units of local government, local 17and regional economic development corporations, and 18not-for-profit organizations approved to receive grants under 19the requirements of the Grant Accountability and Transparency 20Act.21    "IBHS" means the Insurance Institute for Business and Home 22Safety.23    "Low-income limit" means the low-income limit guidelines   HB5529- 2 -LRB104 19839 BAB 33289 b1published by the Illinois Housing Development Authority.2    "State median family income" means the State median family 3income guidelines published by the Illinois Housing 4Development Authority.5    "Very low-income limit" means the very low-income limit 6guidelines updated annually in the Federal Register by the 7United States Department of Housing and Urban Development and 8published by the Illinois Housing Development Authority.9    (b) Terms not otherwise defined in this Section shall have 10the meanings given to those terms under Article XLIX of the 11Illinois Insurance Code.12    (c) Subject to appropriation, the Department shall use 13moneys deposited into the Strengthen Illinois Homes Fund to 14make grants to eligible grantees for the purpose of providing 15financial grants to insurable property owners to assist and 16promote the mitigation of insurable property to resist losses 17due to catastrophic wind and hail events in accordance with 18mitigation program standards.19    (d) The Strengthen Illinois Homes Fund is hereby created 20as a special fund in the State treasury. The Department may 21accept gifts, grants, donations, or other revenues or 22transfers for deposit into the Strengthen Illinois Homes Fund. 23Moneys in the fund shall be used by the Department for the 24purpose of implementing and administering the program 25established under this Section and may be used to contribute 26toward administrative and staffing needs of administering the   HB5529- 3 -LRB104 19839 BAB 33289 b1program.2    (e) Moneys in the fund not expended at the close of a 3fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the 4next fiscal year.5    (f) To the extent funding is available, the Director shall 6implement and administer the program in accordance with this 7Section.8    (g) On or before July 1, 2028, and depending on 9availability of funds, the Department of Insurance shall 10identify areas of need to administer a pilot grant program 11known as the Strengthen Illinois Homes Program. The Department 12of Insurance shall identify the determined areas of need by 13rule and by other communication to the public. Areas of need 14shall be determined based on the following factors:15        (1) areas that, based on historical data, have a 16    higher susceptibility of catastrophic wind and hail 17    events;18        (2) areas where the average written premium exceeds 19    the median household income;20        (3) areas where the average written premium exceeds 21    the insurable property value; or22        (4) any other factors the Director of Insurance 23    determines to meet the purpose of the program.24    (h) Individual grant awards shall be determined based on 25availability of funds, the expected cost of the mitigation 26project, and the percentage of family income relative to   HB5529- 4 -LRB104 19839 BAB 33289 b1either the county area median family income or the State 2median family income of the area of need, adjusted for family 3size as published by the Illinois Housing Development 4Authority, whichever is higher. Acceptance of individual grant 5awards applications shall be determined by the eligible 6grantee, in accordance with this Act. Applicants within an 7area of need whose income is equal to or less than 80% of the 8county area median family income adjusted for family size as 9published by the Illinois Housing Development Authority shall 10be prioritized by the eligible grantee. All other applications 11within an area of need shall be accepted on a first-come, 12first-served basis, depending on availability of funds by the 13eligible grantee.14    (i) The Department, in conjunction with the Department of 15Insurance, shall develop a standard application and grant 16award rubric for the eligible grantees. No individual grant 17award shall exceed $15,000. If the cost of the mitigation 18project exceeds the amount of the grant award, the remaining 19cost of the mitigation project is the insurable property 20owner's responsibility. Grant awards must not be used for 21normal maintenance and repairs an insurable property owner is 22expected to perform but may be used in conjunction with 23repairs or reconstruction as necessitated by damages from a 24catastrophic weather event. An individual grant application 25must be approved by the eligible grantee before mitigation 26work on the insurable property is commenced to be eligible to   HB5529- 5 -LRB104 19839 BAB 33289 b1receive a grant under this Section. After a grant application 2is approved by the eligible grantee, the contractor meeting 3the requirements of this Section selected by the insurable 4property owner may begin the work required to bring the 5insurable property into compliance with mitigation program 6standards.7    (j) Once the mitigation work is completed, the contractor 8must submit a copy of the signed contract to the eligible 9grantee, along with an invoice seeking payment and an 10affidavit stating the mitigation program standards were met by 11the work completed. Grant money shall be disbursed by the 12eligible grantee only after a certificate of compliance has 13been issued for the insurable property and is provided to the 14eligible grantee. The eligible grantee may, on behalf of the 15insurable property owner, directly pay the contractor that 16performed the mitigation work. The Department may delineate a 17sliding scale of grant awards based on the requirements of 18subsection (h).19    (k) After the first operating year of the program, the 20Department of Insurance may expand the program to additional 21areas of need, depending on availability of funds, at the 22Director of Insurance's discretion. If the program is 23expanded, applications shall continue to be prioritized 24according to subsection (h).25    (l) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to create 26an entitlement for property owners or obligate the State of   HB5529- 6 -LRB104 19839 BAB 33289 b1Illinois to pay for residential property in Illinois to be 2inspected or retrofitted. All mitigation under this Section is 3contingent upon securing all required local permits and 4applicable inspections to comply with local building codes and 5applicable FORTIFIED program standards. A mitigation project 6receiving a grant under this Section is subject to random 7reinspection at a later date.8    (m) To be eligible to work as a contractor on a project 9funded by a grant under this Act, the contractor must meet all 10of the following program requirements and must maintain a 11current copy of all certificates, licenses, and proof of 12insurance coverage. The eligible contractor must:13        (1) hold a valid residential building contractor and 14    residential remodeler license issued by the appropriate 15    local or State authority for the jurisdiction where the 16    insurable property is located;17        (2) not be subject to disciplinary action by the 18    contractor's licensing authority;19        (3) hold any other valid State or jurisdictional 20    business license or work permits required by law;21        (4) possess an in-force general liability policy with 22    $1,000,000 in liability coverage;23        (5) possess an in-force workers compensation policy;24        (6) register the contractor's business with the 25    Department of Revenue;26        (7) register as a FORTIFIED certified contractor with   HB5529- 7 -LRB104 19839 BAB 33289 b1    the Department and maintain a valid email address on file 2    with the Department; and3        (8) successfully complete the FORTIFIED Roof for High 4    Wind and Hail training provided by the IBHS and maintain 5    an active certification. The training may be offered as 6    separate courses.7    (n) An eligible contractor must not have a financial 8interest, other than payment on behalf of the insurable 9property owner, in any project for which the eligible 10contractor performs work toward a FORTIFIED designation under 11the program. An eligible contractor is prohibited from acting 12as the evaluator for a mitigation program standard designation 13on any project funded by the program. An eligible contractor 14must report to the Department regarding any potential conflict 15of interest before work commences on any job funded by the 16program.17    (o) The Department shall maintain a certified contractor 18database in order for eligible grantees to ensure 19certification before individual grant application approval.20    (p) To be eligible to work as an evaluator on a project 21funded by a grant under this Act, the evaluator must meet all 22program eligibility requirements and must maintain a copy of 23all current certificates and licenses. The evaluator must:24        (1) be in good standing with IBHS and maintain an 25    active certification as a FORTIFIED home evaluator for 26    high wind and hail or a successor certification;  HB5529- 8 -LRB104 19839 BAB 33289 b1        (2) possess an Illinois business license and be 2    registered with the Secretary of State; and3        (3) successfully complete the program training.4    (q) An evaluator must not have a financial interest in any 5project that the evaluator inspects for designation purposes 6for the program. An evaluator must not be an eligible 7contractor or supplier of any material, product, or system 8installed in any insurable property that the evaluator 9inspects for designation purposes for the program. An 10evaluator must not be a sales agent for any home being 11designated for the program. An evaluator must inform the 12Department of any potential conflict of interest impacting the 13evaluator's participation in the program.14    (r) The Department may adopt rules to implement this 15Section.  16    Section 10. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 17Section 5.1038 as follows: 18    (30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new)19    Sec. 5.1038. The Strengthen Illinois Homes Fund. 20    Section 15. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 21changing Sections 143.16 and 143.17 and by adding Section 22143.21e, Article XLVIII, and Article XLIX as follows:   HB5529- 9 -LRB104 19839 BAB 33289 b1    (215 ILCS 5/143.16)  (from Ch. 73, par. 755.16)2    Sec. 143.16. Mailing of cancellation notice. All notices 3of cancellation of insurance to which Section 143.11 applies, 4except for those defined in subsections (a), (b) and (c) of 5Section 143.13 must be mailed at least 30 days prior to the 6effective date of cancellation during the first 60 days of 7coverage. After the coverage has been effective for 61 days or 8more, all notices must be mailed at least 60 days prior to the 9effective date of cancellation. However, where cancellation is 10for nonpayment of premium, the notice of cancellation must be 11mailed at least 10 days before the effective date of the 12cancellation. All such notices shall include a specific 13explanation of the reason or reasons for cancellation and 14shall be mailed to the named insured at the last mailing 15address known to the company. For purposes of this Section, 16the mortgagee or lien holder, if known, may opt to accept 17notification electronically. 18(Source: P.A. 100-475, eff. 1-1-18.) 19    (215 ILCS 5/143.17)  (from Ch. 73, par. 755.17)20    Sec. 143.17. Notice of intention not to renew. 21    a. No company shall fail to renew any policy of insurance, 22as defined in subsections (a), (b), (c), and (h) of Section 23143.13, to which Section 143.11 applies, unless it shall send 24by mail to the named insured at least 60 30 days advance notice 25of its intention not to renew. The company shall maintain   HB5529- 10 -LRB104 19839 BAB 33289 b1proof of mailing of such notice on a recognized U.S. Post 2Office form or a form acceptable to the U. S. Post Office or 3other commercial mail delivery service. The nonrenewal shall 4not become effective until at least 60 30 days from the proof 5of mailing date of the notice to the name insured. 6Notification shall also be sent to the insured's broker, if 7known, or the agent of record, if known, and to the last known 8mortgagee or lien holder. For purposes of this Section, the 9mortgagee or lien holder, insured's broker, or the agent of 10record may opt to accept notification electronically. However, 11where cancellation is for nonpayment of premium, the notice of 12cancellation must be mailed at least 10 days before the 13effective date of the cancellation.14    b. This Section does not apply if the company has 15manifested its willingness to renew directly to the named 16insured. Such written notice shall specify the premium amount 17payable, including any premium payment plan available, and the 18name of any person or persons, if any, authorized to receive 19payment on behalf of the company. If no person is so 20authorized, the premium notice shall so state.21    b-5. This Section does not apply if the company manifested 22its willingness to renew directly to the named insured. 23However, no company may impose changes in deductibles or 24coverage for any policy forms applicable to an entire line of 25business enumerated in subsections (a), (b), (c), and (h) of 26Section 143.13 to which Section 143.11 applies unless the   HB5529- 11 -LRB104 19839 BAB 33289 b1company mails to the named insured written notice of the 2change in deductible or coverage at least 60 days prior to the 3renewal or anniversary date. Notice shall also be sent to the 4insured's broker, if known, or the agent of record.5    c. Should a company fail to comply with (a) or (b) of this 6Section, the policy shall terminate only on the effective date 7of any similar insurance procured by the insured with respect 8to the same subject or location designated in both policies.9    d. Renewal of a policy does not constitute a waiver or 10estoppel with respect to grounds for cancellation which 11existed before the effective date of such renewal.12    e. In all notices of intention not to renew any policy of 13insurance, as defined in Section 143.11 the company shall 14provide the named insured a specific explanation of the 15reasons for nonrenewal.16    f. For purposes of this Section, the insured's broker, if 17known, or the agent of record and the mortgagee or lien holder 18may opt to accept notification electronically. 19(Source: P.A. 100-475, eff. 1-1-18.) 20    (215 ILCS 5/143.21e new)21    Sec. 143.21e. Flood coverage; notice.22    (a) In response to all applications for a policy of fire 23and extended coverage, before the applicant agrees to a 24policy, the company shall provide, and the applicant and 25insurance producer shall sign, a written notice regarding:  HB5529- 12 -LRB104 19839 BAB 33289 b1        (1) the flood coverage in the policy and the flood 2    coverage that is available to the applicant through the 3    company, including the coverage limits and costs thereof; 4    and5        (2) the availability of flood coverage through the 6    National Flood Insurance Program, whether the company can 7    write such coverage, and how the applicant can obtain 8    coverage through the National Flood Insurance Program. The 9    notice must contain attestation language that flood 10    coverage options were explained to the applicant in plain 11    language.12    (b) At least 30 days prior to each renewal of any policy of 13fire and extended coverage, the company shall provide the 14insured with a written notice containing the same information 15required in subsection (a), except that a signature and the 16attestation language are not required.17    (c) The Department may require insurers to use a standard 18form developed by the Department and published on the 19Department's website.  20    (215 ILCS 5/Art. XLVIII heading new)21ARTICLE XLVIII. CLIMATE RISK DISCLOSURE 22    (215 ILCS 5/1801 new)23    Sec. 1801. Short title. This Article may be referred to as 24the Climate Risk Disclosure Law.   HB5529- 13 -LRB104 19839 BAB 33289 b1    (215 ILCS 5/1805 new)2    Sec. 1805. Purpose. The purpose of this Article is to 3enhance transparency about how insurers manage climate-related 4risks and to clarify the Department's authority to require 5companies to participate in climate surveys issued by 6entities, including, but not limited to, the Department and 7the National Association of Insurance Commissioners. This 8Article shall be liberally interpreted to carry into effect 9the intent of this Section. 10    (215 ILCS 5/1810 new)11    Sec. 1810. Applicability. This Article applies to every 12company licensed in Illinois under Classes 1, 2, or 3 of 13Section 4 of this Code and every dental service plan 14corporation, health maintenance organization, or limited 15health service organization licensed in Illinois when such 16company, corporation, or organization writes $100,000,000 or 17more annually in direct premiums nationwide. This threshold 18may be altered by rule. 19    (215 ILCS 5/1815 new)20    Sec. 1815. Climate disclosure survey participation. All 21companies, corporations, and organizations subject to this 22Article shall, upon direction from the Department, participate 23in climate surveys issued by the National Association of   HB5529- 14 -LRB104 19839 BAB 33289 b1Insurance Commissioners. 2    (215 ILCS 5/Art. XLIX heading new)3ARTICLE XLIX. STRENGTHEN ILLINOIS HOMES 4    (215 ILCS 5/1901 new)5    Sec. 1901. Short title. This Article may be referred to as 6the Strengthen Illinois Homes Act. 7    (215 ILCS 5/1902 new)8    Sec. 1902. Purpose. The purpose of this Article is to 9create the Strengthen Illinois Homes Program to assist in and 10promote the mitigation of insurable property to resist losses 11due to catastrophic wind and hail events. 12    (215 ILCS 5/1905 new)13    Sec. 1905. Applicability. This Article applies to 14applicable policies offered, issued, or renewed on or after 15January 1, 2028. 16    (215 ILCS 5/1910 new)17    Sec. 1910. Definitions. In this Article: 18    "Certificate of compliance" means a certificate of 19compliance with the most recent version of mitigation program 20standards or any certificate of compliance that may be issued 21by other acceptable standards to be permitted by   HB5529- 15 -LRB104 19839 BAB 33289 b1administrative rule.2    "Homeowners insurance" means the personal multi-peril 3property coverages commonly known as homeowners insurance.4    "Insurable property" means an owner-occupied dwelling in 5the State of Illinois that may be covered by homeowners 6insurance.7    "Mitigation program standards" means a designation of 8either FORTIFIED Roof (Roof), FORTIFIED Silver (Silver), 9FORTIFIED Gold (Gold), or a successor designation, including a 10hail supplement, as administered by the Insurance Institute 11for Business and Home Safety (IBHS) or a successor entity. 12Other acceptable standards may be determined by the Director 13of Insurance by rule.14    "Nonfortified insurable property" means an insurable 15property that does not otherwise comply with mitigation 16program standards. 17    (215 ILCS 5/1920 new)18    Sec. 1920. Mitigation program insurance premium discounts.19    (a) For homeowners insurance policies, an insurer shall 20provide an actuarially justified premium discount or insurance 21rate reduction to an owner who either:22        (1) builds or locates a new insurable property in 23    Illinois that meets the mitigation program standards; or24        (2) retrofits an existing insurable property in 25    Illinois to meet the mitigation program standards.  HB5529- 16 -LRB104 19839 BAB 33289 b1    (b) The Director may by rule permit other acceptable 2standards by which insurers must provide a premium discount or 3an insurance rate reduction.4    (c) An insurer shall differentiate the premium discount or 5insurance rate reduction according to which designation of 6mitigation program standards the policyholder achieves.7    (d) Nothing in this Section is intended to restrict an 8insurer from implementing additional premium discounts or 9insurance rate reductions related to mitigation efforts that 10may not adhere to all mitigation program standards.11    (e) An insurer shall provide the premium discount or 12insurance rate reduction on the coverage of the insured's 13insurable property after the insurer obtains or receives a 14certificate of compliance for that insurable property. An 15insurer is not required to obtain or receive a certificate of 16compliance in order to provide a premium discount or insurance 17rate reduction under subsection (a) of this Section.18    (f) Upon initial implementation of this Section, companies 19must file with the Department a stand-alone rate filing 20showing compliance.21    (g) The Director may adopt rules that establish standard 22discount amounts, targets, or benchmarks for the coverage of 23insurable property meeting the mitigation program standards 24outlined in subsection (a) of this Section. Any standard 25discount amounts, targets, or benchmarks adopted by rule shall 26be:  HB5529- 17 -LRB104 19839 BAB 33289 b1        (1) optional; and2        (2) primarily for the benefit of insurers that are 3    unable to obtain actuarially valid data to provide a 4    premium discount or rate reduction under subsection (a) of 5    this Section due to inadequate resources or experience.6    (h) An insurer operating in the State of Illinois shall 7make information regarding the availability of such a discount 8accessible on its website in a manner that is searchable and 9accessible to the general public without requiring an 10individual to create any account.  11    (215 ILCS 5/1925 new)12    Sec. 1925. Mitigation program discount disclosure to 13policyholder.14    (a) Upon the premium discount or insurance rate reduction 15described in subsection (a) of Section 1920 becoming effective 16to an insured's policy, an insurer shall, in plain language, 17provide the policyholder with information either in writing or 18electronically regarding the following:19        (1) the premium discount or insurance rate reduction 20    the policyholder will be receiving, either as a percentage 21    or dollar amount; and22        (2) specific information regarding whether the premium 23    discount or insurance rate reduction was attributed to the 24    policyholder's homeowners insurance or the policyholder's 25    coverage for wind or hail damage or other peril-specific   HB5529- 18 -LRB104 19839 BAB 33289 b1    coverage as defined by the insurer.2    (b) An insurer shall provide this disclosure in a separate 3notification to the policyholder on initial implementation of 4the premium discount or insurance rate reduction and maintain 5the information on the policyholder's declarations page.6    (c) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to require 7an insurer to share proprietary information or trade secrets 8with the policyholder in the disclosure required by subsection 9(a) of this Section.  10    (215 ILCS 5/1930 new)11    Sec. 1930. Endorsement offer to upgrade insurable property 12to mitigation program standards.13    (a) An insurer writing homeowners insurance policies that 14provide coverage of an insurable property that is a 15nonfortified insurable property shall offer an optional rider, 16endorsement, or supplemental policy provision that provides 17the insured a right to receive claim payments for the cost to 18upgrade an insurable property to mitigation program standards 19for a claim that:20        (1) is covered under the insurance policy contract; 21    and22        (2) requires total replacement of the covered 23    insurable property's roof as defined by the insurance 24    policy or contract.25    (b) The rider, endorsement, or supplemental policy   HB5529- 19 -LRB104 19839 BAB 33289 b1provision must upgrade the nonfortified insurable property 2consistent with any designation under mitigation program 3standards.4    (c) The rider, endorsement, or supplemental policy offer 5must be made at the time that:6        (1) a new policy on a nonfortified insurable property 7    is written; and8        (2) upon first renewal of an existing policy on a 9    nonfortified insurable property.10    (d) Upon initial implementation of this Section, companies 11must file with the Department a stand-alone rate filing 12showing compliance. Additional premiums associated with this 13feature shall be based on actuarially sound methods.14    (e) An insurer operating in the State of Illinois shall 15make information regarding the availability of the rider, 16endorsement, or supplemental policy provision option 17accessible on its website in a manner that is searchable and 18accessible to the general public without requiring an 19individual to create any account.20    (f) The Director may adopt rules necessary to implement 21this Section.  22    (215 ILCS 5/143.15 rep.)23    Section 20. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 24repealing Section 143.15.   HB5529- 20 -LRB104 19839 BAB 33289 b1    Section 25. The Dental Service Plan Act is amended by 2changing Section 25 as follows: 3    (215 ILCS 110/25)  (from Ch. 32, par. 690.25)4    Sec. 25. Application of Insurance Code provisions. Dental 5service plan corporations and all persons interested therein 6or dealing therewith shall be subject to the provisions of 7Articles IIA, XI, and XII 1/2, and XLVIII and Sections 3.1, 8133, 136, 139, 140, 143, 143.31, 143c, 149, 155.49, 355.2, 9355.3, 367.2, 401, 401.1, 402, 403, 403A, 408, 408.2, and 412, 10and subsection (15) of Section 367 of the Illinois Insurance 11Code.12(Source: P.A. 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-656, eff. 1-1-25.) 13    Section 30. The Health Maintenance Organization Act is 14amended by changing Section 5-3 as follows: 15    (215 ILCS 125/5-3)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1411.2)16    Sec. 5-3. Illinois Insurance Code provisions. 17    (a) Health Maintenance Organizations shall be subject to 18the provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140, 19141.1, 141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151, 20152, 153, 154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.22a, 21155.49, 352c, 355.2, 355.3, 355.6, 355.7, 355b, 355c, 356f, 22356g, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u.10, 356v, 356w, 356x, 356z.2, 23356z.3a, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9,   HB5529- 21 -LRB104 19839 BAB 33289 b1356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.17, 2356z.18, 356z.19, 356z.20, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.23, 356z.24, 3356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.28, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.31, 356z.32, 4356z.33, 356z.34, 356z.35, 356z.36, 356z.37, 356z.38, 356z.39, 5356z.40, 356z.40a, 356z.41, 356z.44, 356z.45, 356z.46, 6356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.49, 356z.50, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 7356z.55, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.58, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 8356z.62, 356z.63, 356z.64, 356z.65, 356z.66, 356z.67, 356z.68, 9356z.69, 356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.72, 356z.73, 356z.74, 356z.75, 10356z.76, 356z.77, 356z.78, 356z.79, 356z.80, 356z.81, 356z.82, 11356z.83, 356z.84, 356z.85, 364, 364.01, 364.3, 367.2, 367.2-5, 12367i, 368a, 368b, 368c, 368d, 368e, 370a, 370c, 370c.1, 401, 13401.1, 402, 403, 403A, 408, 408.2, 409, 412, 444, and 444.1, 14paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of Section 367, and Articles 15IIA, VIII 1/2, XII, XII 1/2, XIII, XIII 1/2, XXV, XXVI, and 16XXXIIB, and XLVIII of the Illinois Insurance Code.17    (b) For purposes of the Illinois Insurance Code, except 18for Sections 444 and 444.1 and Articles XIII and XIII 1/2, 19Health Maintenance Organizations in the following categories 20are deemed to be "domestic companies":21        (1) a corporation authorized under the Dental Service 22    Plan Act or the Voluntary Health Services Plans Act;23        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of this 24    State; or25        (3) a corporation organized under the laws of another 26    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents   HB5529- 22 -LRB104 19839 BAB 33289 b1    of this State, except a corporation subject to 2    substantially the same requirements in its state of 3    organization as is a "domestic company" under Article VIII 4    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.5    (c) In considering the merger, consolidation, or other 6acquisition of control of a Health Maintenance Organization 7pursuant to Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code,8        (1) the Director shall give primary consideration to 9    the continuation of benefits to enrollees and the 10    financial conditions of the acquired Health Maintenance 11    Organization after the merger, consolidation, or other 12    acquisition of control takes effect;13        (2)(i) the criteria specified in subsection (1)(b) of 14    Section 131.8 of the Illinois Insurance Code shall not 15    apply and (ii) the Director, in making his determination 16    with respect to the merger, consolidation, or other 17    acquisition of control, need not take into account the 18    effect on competition of the merger, consolidation, or 19    other acquisition of control;20        (3) the Director shall have the power to require the 21    following information:22            (A) certification by an independent actuary of the 23        adequacy of the reserves of the Health Maintenance 24        Organization sought to be acquired;25            (B) pro forma financial statements reflecting the 26        combined balance sheets of the acquiring company and   HB5529- 23 -LRB104 19839 BAB 33289 b1        the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 2        acquired as of the end of the preceding year and as of 3        a date 90 days prior to the acquisition, as well as pro 4        forma financial statements reflecting projected 5        combined operation for a period of 2 years;6            (C) a pro forma business plan detailing an 7        acquiring party's plans with respect to the operation 8        of the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 9        acquired for a period of not less than 3 years; and10            (D) such other information as the Director shall 11        require.12    (d) The provisions of Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois 13Insurance Code and this Section 5-3 shall apply to the sale by 14any health maintenance organization of greater than 10% of its 15enrollee population (including, without limitation, the health 16maintenance organization's right, title, and interest in and 17to its health care certificates).18    (e) In considering any management contract or service 19agreement subject to Section 141.1 of the Illinois Insurance 20Code, the Director (i) shall, in addition to the criteria 21specified in Section 141.2 of the Illinois Insurance Code, 22take into account the effect of the management contract or 23service agreement on the continuation of benefits to enrollees 24and the financial condition of the health maintenance 25organization to be managed or serviced, and (ii) need not take 26into account the effect of the management contract or service   HB5529- 24 -LRB104 19839 BAB 33289 b1agreement on competition.2    (f) Except for small employer groups as defined in the 3Small Employer Rating, Renewability and Portability Health 4Insurance Act and except for medicare supplement policies as 5defined in Section 363 of the Illinois Insurance Code, a 6Health Maintenance Organization may by contract agree with a 7group or other enrollment unit to effect refunds or charge 8additional premiums under the following terms and conditions:9        (i) the amount of, and other terms and conditions with 10    respect to, the refund or additional premium are set forth 11    in the group or enrollment unit contract agreed in advance 12    of the period for which a refund is to be paid or 13    additional premium is to be charged (which period shall 14    not be less than one year); and15        (ii) the amount of the refund or additional premium 16    shall not exceed 20% of the Health Maintenance 17    Organization's profitable or unprofitable experience with 18    respect to the group or other enrollment unit for the 19    period (and, for purposes of a refund or additional 20    premium, the profitable or unprofitable experience shall 21    be calculated taking into account a pro rata share of the 22    Health Maintenance Organization's administrative and 23    marketing expenses, but shall not include any refund to be 24    made or additional premium to be paid pursuant to this 25    subsection (f)). The Health Maintenance Organization and 26    the group or enrollment unit may agree that the profitable   HB5529- 25 -LRB104 19839 BAB 33289 b1    or unprofitable experience may be calculated taking into 2    account the refund period and the immediately preceding 2 3    plan years.4    The Health Maintenance Organization shall include a 5statement in the evidence of coverage issued to each enrollee 6describing the possibility of a refund or additional premium, 7and upon request of any group or enrollment unit, provide to 8the group or enrollment unit a description of the method used 9to calculate (1) the Health Maintenance Organization's 10profitable experience with respect to the group or enrollment 11unit and the resulting refund to the group or enrollment unit 12or (2) the Health Maintenance Organization's unprofitable 13experience with respect to the group or enrollment unit and 14the resulting additional premium to be paid by the group or 15enrollment unit.16    In no event shall the Illinois Health Maintenance 17Organization Guaranty Association be liable to pay any 18contractual obligation of an insolvent organization to pay any 19refund authorized under this Section.20    (g) Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, 21if any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in 22accordance with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative 23Procedure Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint 24Committee on Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so 25adopted, for whatever reason, is unauthorized. 26(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24;   HB5529- 26 -LRB104 19839 BAB 33289 b1103-123, eff. 1-1-24; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-420, eff. 21-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-551, 3eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-618, eff. 1-1-25; 4103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 103-656, eff. 1-1-25; 103-700, eff. 51-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-753, 6eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-777, eff. 8-2-24; 7103-808, eff. 1-1-26; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 81-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-1, eff. 6-9-25; 104-28, 9eff. 1-1-26; 104-42, eff. 8-1-25; 104-68, eff. 1-1-26; 104-73, 10eff. 1-1-26; 104-98, eff. 1-1-26; 104-289, eff. 1-1-26; 11104-324, eff. 1-1-26; 104-334, eff. 8-15-25; 104-379, eff. 121-1-26; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; revised 11-21-25.) 13    Section 35. The Limited Health Service Organization Act is 14amended by changing Section 4003 as follows: 15    (215 ILCS 130/4003)  (from Ch. 73, par. 1504-3)16    Sec. 4003. Illinois Insurance Code provisions. Limited 17health service organizations shall be subject to the 18provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140, 141.1, 19141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151, 152, 153, 20154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.37, 155.49, 352c, 21355.2, 355.3, 355b, 355d, 356m, 356q, 356v, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 22356z.10, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.32, 23356z.33, 356z.41, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 24356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.61, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.71,   HB5529- 27 -LRB104 19839 BAB 33289 b1356z.73, 356z.74, 356z.75, 356z.79, 356z.80, 356z.81, 356z.83, 2356z.84, 356z.85, 364.3, 368a, 370a, 401, 401.1, 402, 403, 3403A, 408, 408.2, 409, 412, 444, and 444.1 and Articles IIA, 4VIII 1/2, XII, XII 1/2, XIII, XIII 1/2, XXV, XXVI, and XXXIIB, 5and XLVIII of the Illinois Insurance Code. Nothing in this 6Section shall require a limited health care plan to cover any 7service that is not a limited health service. For purposes of 8the Illinois Insurance Code, except for Sections 444 and 444.1 9and Articles XIII and XIII 1/2, limited health service 10organizations in the following categories are deemed to be 11domestic companies:12        (1) a corporation under the laws of this State; or13        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of another 14    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents 15    of this State, except a corporation subject to 16    substantially the same requirements in its state of 17    organization as is a domestic company under Article VIII 18    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.19(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 20103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445, eff. 211-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 103-656, 22eff. 1-1-25; 103-700, eff. 1-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 23103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-832, eff. 241-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-1, eff. 6-9-25; 104-42, 25eff. 8-1-25; 104-73, eff. 1-1-26; 104-98, eff. 1-1-26; 26104-289, eff. 1-1-26; 104-324, eff. 1-1-26; 104-334, eff.   HB5529- 28 -LRB104 19839 BAB 33289 b18-15-25; 104-379, eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; revised 211-21-25.)  HB5529- 29 -LRB104 19839 BAB 33289 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    20 ILCS 605/871 new4    30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new5    215 ILCS 5/143.16from Ch. 73, par. 755.166    215 ILCS 5/143.17from Ch. 73, par. 755.177    215 ILCS 5/143.21e new8    215 ILCS 5/Art. XLVIII 9    heading new10    215 ILCS 5/1801 new11    215 ILCS 5/1805 new12    215 ILCS 5/1810 new13    215 ILCS 5/1815 new14    215 ILCS 5/Art. XLIX 15    heading new16    215 ILCS 5/1901 new17    215 ILCS 5/1902 new18    215 ILCS 5/1905 new19    215 ILCS 5/1910 new20    215 ILCS 5/1920 new21    215 ILCS 5/1925 new22    215 ILCS 5/1930 new23    215 ILCS 5/143.15 rep.24    215 ILCS 110/25from Ch. 32, par. 690.2525    215 ILCS 125/5-3from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1411.2  HB5529- 30 -LRB104 19839 BAB 33289 b1    215 ILCS 130/4003from Ch. 73, par. 1504-3